
## Journal 000

Arden was born a station rat - an orphan kid raised by thieves and criminals. They had nothing and fought for everything. This was on a nowhere station called Vrarid. Arden never knew his parents and by the time he thought to ask any questions about them, any information that might have existed was long gone. 

Vrarid was a minor station - a gateway for people on their way to other locations. It was a stop off people made, and that was all. Vrarid had once been a successful mining operation in an asteroid field of the Klohl system. There just wasn't much else in Klohl; no habitable planets, and a couple of gas giants. The only thing keeping it going was the station's positioning and income from travelers. As a kid, Arden learned to beg, con, and pickpocket those passing through when he had to. 

One day, when Arden was about 10 years old and was particularly starved, he tried to pick the pocket of a man passing by. As soon as his hand left the man's pocket, he spun and grabbed Arden. "Well now, little one - that was well done," he said while holding Arden's arm with an iron grip. He paused then, just staring at Arden for a few seconds. Arden thought he was dead for sure. "Sorry sir, I didn't mean anything. My mistake" Arden stammered out, hoping the man's grip would loosen just enough for him to take off. 

The man just stood there and looked at Arden for several seconds and then asked "How about you and I go over to that vendor and get something to eat? Or do you have a favorite place around here?". Arden wasn't sure what to do, so he just pointed to 'Narland's Eatery' - a favorite that he could rarely afford. The man eyed Arden again for a second and asked "Now when I let go, you could run away and never see me again. Or we could walk over there and I could buy us both a decent meal". With that, he let go and started walking to Narland's.

Arden was never really sure why he did not run that day - that would have been the smart and normal thing to do - but he was starving. Instead, he followed the man. They sat down at a table and the man bought Arden two meals of whatever he wanted. While Arden ate the food, the man said his name was Quin and he was a trader. While Arden ate, Quin did most of the talking but did ask Arden questions about the station and life on Vrarid. 

After Arden had finished eating, Quin told him he would be on station a few days. He then offered to meet Arden here at Narland's at the same time every day until he left - if that was something Arden wanted to do. He said he needed information and Arden was being a great help to him. was Quin and he was a trader. While Arden ate, Quin talking a lot but did ask Arden questions about the station and life on Vrarid. After Arden had finished eating, Quin told him he would be on station a few more days. 

After Arden had finished eating, Quin told him he would be on station a few days. He then offered to meet Arden here at Narland's at the same time every day until he left - if that was something Arden wanted to do. He said he needed information and Arden was being a great help to him. 

Now Arden was not completely naive, and he had heard all the horror stories about kids getting abducted by weird individuals and groups and never seen again, or cut up or whatever. But for some reason, he did not get a sense of danger or malice from Quin. Arden told Quin thank you and parted ways. Over the next few days, he met Quin and was told many stories of the places Quin went, the money he made, and the wonders he had seen. Then, on the day before Quin was set to leave, he offered to 'hire' Arden to help him with his trade business and to run his Ornithor starship. 

For Arden, this was mind-melting. He had only known Vrarid and mostly just the docks, and shopping sector where they begged and stole from people passing through. He had only known the gangs and other street kids, scraping by on what they could find, steal, or trade - but really he had nothing here. There were plenty of bullies and negatives for sure, but this was his home and he did have some friends. What little he had seemed like too much to lose and he wasn't sure he could just leave. Also, he could not understand what value Quin thought he had, or how he could help him.  

But Quin had also lit his imagination with the stories of his adventures and he liked talking with him and eating regular meals, Quin told him to meet there again the next day, and he would hire him. 

And that is how Arden started his adventures with Quin the very next day. Quin became part father, brother, and best friend to Arden over the next 10 years. Quin sometimes encouraged things, and sometimes demanded things that Arden needed to do. They worked and played it was better than Arden could have hoped for. They were never rich, but anything was better than what Arden had before. And they were always on the move, seeing new places, people, and the wonders around the "The Forge". 

Most of the time, Arden trained and learned from a virtual system and eventually knew everything about the ship. Quin also had a robot named B2EMO or "B2". It was an old maintenance and cargo droid that was simple, but kind-hearted. Arden learned from it as well. And while Quin was a trader, Arden realized he was also something else. Arden did not notice this until he was much older when he started to learn 'the trade business'. 

Trading was something they did, but not very profitably. They barely made enough to get from one place to another, and yet Quin always provided additional funds whenever needed. At first, Arden assumed he just had a large savings set aside for emergencies. But Arden also noticed that Quin did most of his business networking and contact meetings alone. Arden even followed him once, but Quin had not met with anyone, he seemed to just be following someone else around. Arden never tried that again.

It was not until later - after Quin's death - that Arden found out he worked for the Keepers. Spying or collecting information for them and who knows what else. 

Then, on Skyreach Enclave, Arden was completing the offload of some gas extraction equipment they had sold there. Quin was away on one of his client meetings. Arden was just verifying that the payment details had been deposited into their account when he noticed the local law authority walking up. They approached the ship and asked "Is this the ship called the "Astral Phoenix" owned by Quin Rondelles?". Arden replied that it was. "And who are you?" they asked.  Arden replied "I am Arden Rondelles, son and co-pilot." 

This was now 10 years later and Quin had legally adopted Arden several years ago so that I would have legal benefits and authority to do business on his behalf. Arden did not have a known last name when he first met Quin, so taking on his had been awkward, but also made him proud. 

The official looked at Arden, his face softened. "Arden, I am sorry to tell you this. We found a body early today with his identification of Quin Rondelles on it and his description appears to match up with the pilot records we have for this ship. Can you come with us and identify the body?" This was the start of a shocked state that Arden would stay in for some time.  

Arden went with the officers and it was indeed Quin. The Officers had analyzed the scene, the body and provided Arden with all the data and reports. It appeared to be a robbery/murder in one of the less safe districts. Unfortunately, the scene was pretty clean of any evidence, but they were still 'looking into it', but it did not look like they would find anything else. The officials were kind enough but it was obviously ready to move on to the next case. Arden was too stunned by everything to think or argue. He paid to have Quin cremated and then returned to the Astral Phoenix.

B2 was waiting for Arden at the airlock. When Arden had left, he had not told B2 anything other than to 'Lock the Astral Phoenix down and wait for me'. Now he would have to tell B2 that Quin was gone. He wasn't sure how the droid would take it. B2 had been with Quin since long before Arden. B2 was like a child mentally and emotionally and could be strangely sensitive - this could go badly.

Arden walked in through the airlock, closed it behind him heading up to the galley, and sat down at the table. B2 followed him in and waited. Arden looked at B2 and then down at my hands while he talked. "B2 - I am not sure a good way to say this, so I will just put it out there. Quin is gone... he's dead. I just came from the Skyreach Enforcement Office to identify him. Quin is not coming back." Arden looked over at B2, who was unmoving and quiet for a minute. 

Arden rubbed at his temples gently, feeling the weight of the tragic news settling in. "B2, I know you're processing what I said, and I don't expect you to fully understand right away," he said quietly. "But Quin was more than just our captain and owner of the Astral Phoenix. He was family to both of us, and his loss leaves a gaping hole in our lives." His voice cracks ever so slightly as he speaks, betraying the composure he was trying to maintain.

Then - in his very robotic and monotone voice - that he can somehow still inflect with emotion - asks "What will we do now? Who will tell us what to do? I do not want to be without Quin, I do not like this. I feel very confused." Arden put a hand on B2, holding back his emotions, "Its ok B2, we will figure it out. We still have each other, right? And we still have the Astral Phoenix." B2 actually looks down and says "You are right Ard, I am sorry. I just miss Quin already". 

Arden patted B2's metallic arm, feeling a lump form in his throat trying to comfort the droid. "We both miss Quin deeply, B2. But we can honor his memory by continuing his legacy. I know it won't be easy, but together, we can navigate this difficult time." Arden rose from the table, his eyes scanning the ship's interior as if searching for a ghost. "Let's focus on our duties, B2. We must keep the Astral Phoenix operational, ensuring she remains airworthy and functional." He forced a weak smile. "Who knows, maybe someday we'll find ourselves on an adventure that Quin would have loved."

B2 seemed to freeze for a minute and then said "Quin told me that if anything were to happen to him, to tell you to contact Sadia Solana. That she would know what to do." He moved to look at Arden with his one lens and said "I would like to go to my charge station now for a while". Arden nodded to B2 and sat back to think of their next step. He had been unable to mentally move forward at all since encountering the officers.

> House keeping items
>  - I have reduced Arden's spirit down to 1 as a result of "Endure Stress". I think this is a major life blow, but to go to zero I think would have him bordering on hopeless. I think Arden is a survivor and it would take a little more to reduce him to zero.

 Arden sat awhile considering everything, trying to sort it all out. He did not want to focus on the loss of Quin yet, he was afraid that would consume him and he needed to focus. He needed to consider the consequences of the loss of Quin and any issues that need to be addressed right now. 

Years ago, Quin legally set Arden as his adopted son, and then later as co-pilot of the Astral Phoenix and then again later as co-owner of the trade business "Rondelles Shipping and Trade" - or RST. With his passing now officially documented, Arden would now be designated the sole pilot and owner. This would all transfer to Arden as the primary holder with little additional effort on his part. They had some savings (that Arden knew of) and he had just made a decent profit from the extraction equipment. 

Arden had yet to purchase any new trade goods - since Quin had not told him the next destination as yet. This was one of the reasons they had never really been that profitable. They rarely pre-planned more than a jump or two in advance. This was something Arden had complained about on several occasions. Buying and selling goods was a lot more challenging when you had no idea what to source from your current location and what the value might be at the destination.

Quin said that Arden's management of of RST made it possible for them to keep going, but the main reason they went was the business that Quin did in 'artifacts and information'. This had always been clouded in vagaries and generalizations, and Arden could never catch a pattern with what he did. Quin was never forthcoming on this aspect with Arden. "One day I will explain this all to you, it's just not the time yet" he would say. That would never happen now and Arden wondered if this is what got him killed. Arden wondered now if he would ever find out about this part of his life.

Just then my comm alerted Arden to a message. It was the Skyreach Enforcement Office letting him know he could come back to collect Quins possessions and ashes from the cremation. Arden stood up, and called to B2 "I will be back in a bit, lock down the ship". B2 acknowledged and then went to the station to collect the items.

The trip to the station was uneventful and he returned in short order. Sitting again at the galley table, he opened the container the officers had provided and spread out Quin's possessions. Nothing appeared out of the ordinary or missing; his long coat, black iron amulet, wrist comm, M33 energy pistol, and plasma knife. It seemed odd all of this had been left on him and he was frustrated by the senselessness of it. 

Arden plugged in Quin's comm pad, entered his decryption code, and looked through the logs. The only thing of interest was the entry for 'Meet Farikus'. The name meant nothing to Arden, but he could look into it later.

Arden paused there and thought back to what B2 had said "Quin told me that if anything were to happen to him, to contact Sadia Solana". So he at least had two things to move forward with; Farikus or Sadia. He decided to start by reaching out to Sadia.

Sadia was probably the only connection of Quin's he had ever really spoken with at length outside of regular RST business. It seemed like she had always been in the background since the beginning and was friendly most of the time. Quin had introduced her to Arden practically on day one. Afterward, Quin had regularly thrown Arden into conversations with her at the end of his communications or recorded messages. At first, it had felt like an interrogation with Sadia. Arden was always telling her what he was studying with her suggesting things he should review or look into. 

Then later, it became more about trade deals and working with people. Quin had told Arden "Nothing is a secret with Sadia" and how he should treat her like an aunt. Arden had never had an aunt, so this was not terribly helpful. But he understood to treat her like family and after a short time, she became more friendly, encouraging, and always positive. Thinking of her made Arden smile a moment, but then he remembered why he needed to contact her now.

Arden left the galley going into the bridge of the Astral Phoenix and headed to the comm console to punch up her comm code. It was extremely unlikely for her to be in any of the local systems, but he was going to query her through the Echo Beacon Relay System (EBRS) to see. Most likely, Arden would have to send a data packet through a Courier outside the local network to get something to her and then have a drawn-out conversation of separate packets over the next week.   

> I roll the Oracle to ask if Sadia is in comms range or not. I think this is unlikely, and roll a 74. This is so close to being a yes that I am going to lean into it a bit. I am going to say a message is waiting at the console saying she is going to be in the local sector in a days time.
> I roll a couple of times on "initial Disposition" to see what may be going on(41–50 Suspicious) and "Character Goal" (30–31 Fight injustice)


As Arden sat at the console, and noticed the indicator showing there was an incoming message. He started the controls and it was a message from Sadia to Quin. He opened the message "Quin, I know you were planning to be headed to Skyreach, but I have serious concerns. Reports are that the corruption seeping into that place has increased the threat level dramatically. Please use extreme caution, something feels very off about this. I am going to be traveling to that sector for some related business and we should meet face to face. It would also be nice to finally meet Arden in person."

Sadia continued "I will send an update when I am in local comms in the next day or two". Woah, this was major news. Arden had never actually met Sadia in person. This changed everything. He would have to extend our docking fee at least one more day, but it was worth it! And it was better than long-distance comms. He pinged back a general receipt acknowledgment to Sadia. This message will be waiting to detect her in the local EBRS queue for the next 48 hours.

With that done, he decided to put everything else on hold and found B2. On a ship like theirs with only the two of them to maintain it (Quin had never been good at this kind of thing), there was always work to do. The Astral Phoenix had always had a finicky port side Eidolon field stabilizer array that needed tuning. Also, he wanted to stay busy and not think for a while.



## Journal 001
Arden and B2 worked on the array long hours until Arden is beyond exhausted. Arden then crashes hard in his bunk, only to be roused a few hours later by a comms notification he had setup. The EBRS packet had been delivered to Sadia so she was in the local area. She would arrive at Skyreach with a few hours. That would give Arden time to wake up and prep before she jumped into the system and docked.

Arden showered, dressed, paid the dock fee, and was reviewing the local stock inventory when he got another comms message from Sadia that was intended for Quin. "Meet me at the planetary observation food court - I saw where the Arrokoth Cloud Skimmer served at the Makkon is supposed to be amazing. It's been a while since I ate something good someone else made. Bring Arden." Again, Arden sent a general acknowledgment ping as if from Quin. He wasn't sure how he was going to tell Sadia about Quin yet.    

Arden looked up the directions to the "planetary observation food court" and specifically to "Makkon's". Arden was vaguely aware of the reputation of the food court, but neither Quin nor Arden had made an effort to go. It was supposed to have an amazing view of the gas giant. With directions in mind, he headed for the airlock.  "B2 - lock the ship down and I will be back in a bit."

As reported, the view from the food court was indeed amazing. It was under a massive domed ceiling that faced the gas giant Arrokoth. This showcased the grandeur and dynamic nature of the gas giant. Its constantly swirling canvas of vibrant colors and weather patterns made it difficult to focus on anything else. Arden stopped a minute to stare at it. Things like this had never grown old to him and it was one of the reasons he had joined with Quin from the beginning. Being raised on Vrarid with no views and humanity at its worst - seeing places like this still amazed him.

Over the 10 years on the Astral Phoenix, Quin and Arden had jumped from place to place almost every week. In that time Arden had never grown bored with the diversity and wonders of the universe. After a couple of minutes, he remembered his goal here and moved on. 

Makkon's was the kind of high-end place that Arden would never have picked or afforded, but this is where Sadia had said to meet. He immediately saw her unmistakable green and brown ship suit and chestnut hair. Seeing her, he had to admit he had always thought she was beautiful and always felt a bit shy and awkward. The right side of her face was covered with fine scars from some accident when she was younger, but he never really noticed this. It was her green eyes and smile that he always saw.

Just then she turned to see Arden while he was walking up. Immediately her face lights up with recognition and a huge grin. She shouts "Arden!" and runs over to him. She was shorter than he was, which he did not expect, and she wrapped her arms around him like an old friend. "Arden I can't believe we are standing here breathing the same air. And you are so tall!" After looking me up and down she glanced around and asked "So where is Quin? Don't tell me he is going to be late or something." Arden just looked down not knowing what to say, but the look on his face told her everything. 

Sadia puts a hand over her mouth for a second and then something almost seems to switch in her and she straightens up. She takes a minute to look around and then says "Ok, ok. Well let's go somewhere quiet where we can talk. The Cloud Skimmer will have to wait till another time, we need drinks and we need privacy". She speaks something into her wrist comm, reads some data and then nods pointing across the way to a place called "The Vortex Lounge". "There," she says, grabbing Arden's hand and halfway dragging him along. 

The "Vortex Lounge" was the kind of sketchy place they tell you never to go into. But Sadia marched right in an sat them at a dark table in a corner and then ordered two shots of 'Skyreach's finest'. Once they arrived, she held up her glass and said "To absent friends never forgotten". I held up my glass and watched her drain her's in one quick drink. Arden was not a drinker and had no idea what was going on, but followed along. He threw back the drink and felt the burn of it all the way down. A small shiver worked its way up his spine and then a spreading warmth through his body. 

Arden realized suddenly he must have closed his eyes while experiencing this and opened them to see Sadia watching him with a crooked smile. "Was that your first shot of whiskey Ard?" Arden nodded in acknowledgement and she laughed out loud. "Well what the hell has Quin been teaching you all this time?" and as she said it he could see the note of sadness creeping into her eyes. "Ok," she said, "now start at the beginning and tell me everything." 

Arden started by saying there wasn't much to tell, but once he started it all came out and it took over an hour to get through it all. Most of the time was spent with Sadia asking increasingly more detailed questions and Arden providing as much as he could. At the end of this, she reaches over and squeezes Arden's hand. "Ard, I am sorry for this, but you are going to get through this. I know how important Quin was to you and I am sorry if I have been a little rough with my questions. We need to talk in more detail, but not here. Let's go back to the Astral Phoenix and I can tell you the rest."

Once more, Arden found himself sitting in the galley of the Astral Phoenix. All of Quin's things were still spread out on the table. Sadia paces back and forth in the small space looking at the items on the table. She runs a hand over the black iron amulet. She picks it up and places it around my neck. "I know you don't need me to tell you this, but this is yours now and you must make it your own. This 'event' was always a possible scenario and Quin made plans, but that does not make it any easier." 

"You see when Quin first told me he had taken you in, I told him it was a mistake. I was angry with him and thought he was going to make our job harder. Not because I did not like you or did not find it noble of him. But what we do.. what I do, there is no place for vulnerabilities or attachments. Did you know that Quin had a younger brother? No? I assumed as much. His brother died tragically when he was young, and his whole family actually. That was the event that drove him to our cause. His drive and lack of personal attachments made him perfect for his work, at least for a while."

"Quin worked alone for years with me. He said that when he saw you, you reminded him of his little brother and the family he'd lost, of things he forced himself to forget. Quin had a big heart, and that's one of the things I loved about him, but he also made some foolish decisions from time to time because of it. I am glad to say that he proved me wrong with you though. I think you kept him grounded and sane for the last 10 years. I think you saved him as much as he saved you. For a while, he was heading in a very dark direction until you reminded him how to be a person again."

Sadia pauses there a minute lost in thought. "The thing is," she starts again, "Quin and I work for a group that fights to protect everyone from malicious and tyrannical powers. We are part of The Keepers. Forget everything you have heard about us. We are one of the few forces for good in this universe. Anyway, I was his handler and he was my contact in the field, an information collector... a spy. Now I do not know for sure this is what killed him, but I find it hard to believe he was randomly murdered being at the wrong place at the wrong time. He was too smart for that, too cautious." 

She looks at Arden. "You see, you have a choice now. You have a ship, money, knowledge, capability, and skills, everything you could need to go off and build a successful business or whatever you want. You could do that, or you could keep doing what Quin did and fight for a better universe. Now I am pretty sure Quin would be very upset with me for trying to bring you in like this. Especially before he had a chance to explain it to you and give you time to think it through. But times are desperate, I am desperate and I am running out of options. But let me finish before you speak."

""I think you can continue the work he was doing here and I think you want to know for sure what happened to Quin. Now, you knew what kind of person Quin was and what he believed in. You may not have known all the details of his life, but you knew the man. Do you want to continue in his footsteps and on that journey with me? Or do you want to take the other path and find your own way? I want you to know that neither choice is wrong here."

"This is the very reason I do this, this is the reason for my fight - so that others can choose. I fight so others CAN be traders, or scientists or whatever their dream is and follow the paths they want. I fight because there are people out there who want the opposite of this. They want to control and dictate to the rest of us WHO and WHAT to be. I cannot stand by for that." She pauses again and then looks at Arden "Will you join me and help me with this?" Arden looks at her and nods with determination in his eyes. She smiles and nods back to him. "Ok then."

> I am going to make the vow "Work with Sadia to uncover the organization behind Quin's death." This becomes the Background Vow
> I am also going to make the "Connection Move" called "Develop your relationship"
> I roll a strong hit: "On a strong hit, mark 2 ticks on your bonds legacy track."
> This gives me my first ticks on Bonds!

> Here I am going to roll on what it is that Sadia and Quin were up to on the standard Oracle tables: 85, 41, 74, 77, 11, 05
> - Action: 85 Secure
> - Theme 41 Hate
> - Descriptor: 74 Pillaged
> - Focus: 77 Shortcut
> - Story Complication: 11–14 Enemy reveals unexpected powers, abilities, or influence
> - Story Clue 4–6 Connects to a known rumor or scandal
> I am going to interpret this as something fairly simple on the surface. A known group with ties to corruption has stolen secure information about a location. This information is thought by most to be a rumor and very vague, but the secured information was more detailed and provides specific clues. This is information hinting about where old technologies from before The Forge could be located. The information was stolen from the Keepers guild archives. This other group wants to establish dominance through technology and force because of its hatred for the emerging democratic free societies.

> I think Sadia will try to enlist Arden in a limited way to help uncover the group is up to in this sector.

Sadia starts to pace the room and talk, halfway to herself and halfway to Arden. "You may not have been formally trained in spy craft, but you have been raised in its shadow over the last 10 years. Just from being around Quin and learning his methods for doing things, you have always been immersed in this. The way he asked you to do everything was rooted in our profession whether you knew it or not. Your greatest weakness is a lack of direct experience - and knowingly working with others in this state of mind. "

Sadia continues "But even with the trade business, you were learning how to read buyers and sellers. You were learning how far to trust and what motivates people; when to question a deal, and how to read a situation. Spycraft is much the same, but the merchandise is rarely a tangible object, its information and understanding motives. You have to learn who is motivated by an ideology and who is motivated by money or power. In business, everyone needs to make a little profit somehow, the same thing is true in spycraft. But have to know everyone's angle and that the costs can be much higher."

She stops pacing to look at me. "What I ask of you is to carefully seek information from the local settlements. This work has to be done in person and mostly in places like the "Vortex". You will need to go and ask about recent travelers with a cover story like you am looking for a group that recently passed through there. You were supposed to meet up with them to deliver supplies and they missed the rendezvous - or something like that." She pulls out a data chip and slides it across the table to me. 

"That chip contains all of the data I have on a man named 'Orland Turros' that Quin was looking for. He is supposed to have information concerning a group called 'The Council of Ashen Wrights'. I suggest that you never mention this group's name to anyone. I doubt that most people have ever heard it, but the wrong ears would be very suspicious if you breathed it. I do not know who this 'Farikus' is. I advise caution with that name as well. It may be dangerous to throw around given what has happened to Quin. I will look into 'Farikus' and get back to you. You should focus on Orland for now." 

Sadia then sits down and suddenly looks very tired. "Arden, I am sorry. I have thrown a lot at you and I do not want to overwhelm you. I think that is enough for now. I know I am asking a lot with the loss of Quin is still fresh and I have been selfish. I have not even asked you if you are ok and if you need anything from me?" She smiles at Arden with worry in her eyes. "I am OK" Arden tells Sadia. "I think I may still be in shock from what has happened and maybe a little from what you have just told me. But I need something to keep me going for now - and maybe it's this."

Sadia reaches over and grabs my hand with hers again. "I know you are strong and smart and capable. I have watched you grow into a fine man and I know Quin thought the universe of you." She stands up then and bends over to kiss Arden on the  cheek. 

Stepping away she says "Stay in touch with me. I will remain in the sector, but not here on Skyreach. I would suggest you start with that settlement called 'Ironhaven'. It seems more likely than 'Verdant Hollow', but I could be wrong. One last thing, I can help with funds when needed, but you should continue to do business under the "Rondelles Shipping and Trade" name. It is a good cover and you should remain as self-sufficient as possible. With that said - ask if you need something." One last time she squeezes Arden's hand, winks at him, and walks to the airlock and back out into the docks.  

"She seems to like you Ard." B2 says from the corner. Arden feels his cheeks redden "She was just being friendly and making sure we were ok." hes snaps back a little too quickly. Of course B2 had not meant anything, but Arden had not been kissed since he was a boy back on Vrarid. I could still feel her lips on my cheek. He did not have any real designs on Sadia, but damn she was still a fine woman!

> I do the "Recovery Move" of "Hearten" and roll a strong hit.
> I make a strong hit: "you find companionship or comfort and your spirit is strengthened. If you are shaken, clear the impact and take +1 spirit. Otherwise, take +2 spirit. If you make this move as you Sojourn, take +1 more."
> This increases Arden's Spirit from 1 to 3


So there it was, Arden was now working for a secretive organization that was protecting the known galaxy. That felt a little unreal, but that was just one more thing to add to the last couple of days. But it felt right. His life would have been completely different if someone had not helped him. Perhaps this was his chance to give something back for that. Aside from working for the Keepers, Arden wanted to know why this had happened to Quin. He wanted to at least try.

Reaching down, he pulled up the amulet that Quin had worn. Quin had told him it was a family heirloom passed down through the generations from a time before The Forge, before the exodus. He holds the amulet close, admiring its worn, weathered beauty. Running his thumb over the intricate etchings, tracing the patterns with a gentle reverence. His thoughts drift back to the countless stories Quin shared about the history of the Rondelles, the struggles faced, and the triumphs they achieved. As he grasps the amulet, he feels a deep connection to those who came before. He closes his eyes, breathing in deeply as says aloud his "Iron Vow" to the cosmos. "By the stars, I swear this oath. May the spirits of our forebears guide me as I seek justice for Quin Rondelles" It was not much, but it was his.   

> I set the Vow to "Discover what happened to Quin and Avenge him.". This will tie in closely with the Background Vow, but I set this to Formidable. 
> I make a strong hit: "On a strong hit, you are emboldened and it is clear what you must do next. Take +2 momentum."
> This sets my momentum to 4

Now with a plan, Arden cleaned up the table and entered the bridge. It was time to seriously look at Ironhaven and Verdant Hollow. 

> I make the move "Gather information"
> I roll (thanks to wits+3) a strong hit: "On a strong hit, you discover something helpful and specific. The path you must follow or action you must take to make progress is made clear. Envision what you learn. Then, take +2 momentum."
> This bumps me to 6 momentum

If Ironhaven did not have much going, somehow Verdant Hollow had even less. 
Ironhaven was a small mining community on a desert planet called Pyla. The group had obtained the rights from a previously abandoned operation and had found success.
Verdant Hollow was an even smaller community on a jungle planet called Kishar. They were a nature commune with a healthy export of rare medicinal items they had discovered on the planet. 

Both locations would need supplies to support their operations, but there was not much here on Skyreach to source. Researching, Arden located water purification components from a seller on the station and a buyer in Ironhaven. This also helped make up his mind on which place to investigate first. He completed the transactions with the seller and was just waiting for them to bring the cargo to the Astral Phoenix. He also contacts the dock and had the Astral Phoenix stocked with additional foodstuffs and general supplies that were going for standard rates. He could also sell those for a profit.

While waiting for the various cargo deliveries, Arden pulls up the data Sadia had provided on Orland.

> I feel like this is a gain needed since it is a different topic altogether.
> I roll a strong hit: "On a strong hit, you discover something helpful and specific. The path you must follow or action you must take to make progress is made clear. Envision what you learn. Then, take +2 momentum."
> This bumps me to 8 momentum

Arden is not sure what he was expecting opening the data on Orland Torrus, but it was something more.. rogue or dangerous. Of course maybe the data did not paint the whole picture here - but this guy seemed like a fairly boring researcher and not a data broker for spies.
- He is an Astrophysicist specializing in Planetology. 
- He currently works for the Galactic Research Institute (GRI)
- He has been focusing his research on the sectors within what is called the Eventide region of the Forge Globular Cluster.

His physical description was much more interesting as he seemed fairly athletic and handsome from the pictures: Tall, dark-haired, and tanned. Almost every photo of him was outdoors doing something strenuous and physical. He also looked like he would stick out anywhere. He certainly did not seem like an academic.

About that time, Arden heard a notification chime to meet the dock crew for deliveries. He calls B2 and goes down, opens the hold, coordinates the cargo drop, and locks it all down with the help of B2. Then he closed the hold and stood on the dock for a minute just looking around. I felt wrong. Nothing special was going on, just the normal business of a busy dock like this. But today was different and It felt like everyone should know it was different, not just for him.

This was Quin's ship, and this station had been his last stop. But Quin was not going to be there when he walked back into the Astral Phoenix. Quin would not be there to double-check him; "had he locked down the cargo?", "Had he checked the airlocks?", "Had he paid the dock fees, etc.. etc". He would not be there to encourage him or correct him on any of it. All the same, Arden would never be without him, he would never be without the stamp on his heart or mind. He squeezed the medallion under his shirt, took one last look around, and entered the Astral Phoenix as the captain. 


 sends the data to Arden. "Your friend said he would be somewhere around there. You are welcome to stay of course and spend your credits with us all you want. Otherwise, it was a pleasure doing business with you and I wouldn't mind doing it again if you are out this way, we always need stuff." Arden thanks Adda and tells her he is going to look for Orland. Adda waves steps onto the platform and is gone in minutes.

> Housekeeping items
> Marking progress on our Background Vow since finding data on Orland seems like progress there
> 
> I am now making the move "UNDERTAKE AN EXPEDITION" called "Search for Orland on Pyla" since we are trying to locate Orland with a general set of coordinates and it seems like something has happened to him since it has been several days since anyone on Ironhaven has seen him.
> I roll a weak hit: 
> - "On a strong hit, you reach a waypoint. Envision the location and mark progress per the rank of the expedition."
> - "On a weak hit, as above, but this progress costs you. Choose one.
> - ✴ Suffer costs en route: Make a suffer move (-2), or two suffer moves (-1).
> - ✴ Face a peril at the waypoint: Envision what you encounter.
> I mark two progress on the Orland search and take a suffer move "Loose Momentum"
> I envision we spend more time than expected searching the coordinates and loose momentum "When you are delayed or disadvantaged, suffer -1 momentum for a minor setback, -2 for a serious setback, or -3 for a major setback. 
> I think we will take -1 to momentum for a new total of 8


Arden enters the Astral Phoenix, closes up the airlock and cargo bay, inputs the coordinates and punches out of the hanger. 

The coordinates provided by Eleri and Adda were on the other side of the planet and higher up in the northern regions. It was going to be a cooler area for sure. Arden set the autopilot and decided to sleep through it.

Arden wakes to the approach alert a couple of hours later and sets the sensors to look for any craft, beacon, or comms data. Nothing was detected on approach, or after they hit the coordinate marker. He then set the ship computer to track their scan range and started a sector search to look for complex metals. His scanners were not really meant for survey work, but they could at least pick out ship hull metals on the surface of a planet. He also started to visually scan the environment as he searched if this was somehow masked by something in the environment.

Maybe the ship was parked and shut down, running silent, dead, crashed, who knows? And so began a very long and slow sector sweep. It also did not help that this area was crisscrossed with canyons. Arden was not positive, but he doubted that Orland's ship was any larger than the Astral Phoenix. 

He was working in a broadening circular sector search and it had been several hours when he finally caught something visually and at the same time sensors caught a weak power signal. It looked like an Astra Scout - similar to Arden's Ornithor - a common enough multipurpose ship outfitted for survey work. These are generally loaded out to work like a mobile research station.

The ship was parked on a plateau next to a monolithic rock formation. Arden circles a couple of times trying to hail the ship or personal communicators without any response. From a distance, the ship appeared intact, and readings were within norms. Getting closer to it, he notices scorch marks and the main airlock looks open. "Ok, let's sit down next to it and see what's going on here?". A few minutes later Arden steps out of the airlock onto the surface of the plateau. 

Outside, It is windy and cool, but not unbearably so. Arden pulls on his gun and walks over to the open airlock of the other ship. Around the opening, there is scorch and smoke marks like a fire from within. Arden pulls up his mask and then steps into the ship.

Everything on the inside is a mess, it looks like a massive fire swept through the ship gutting it out. Walking through, he does not find any bodies or anything that could help explain the situation. He might be able to pull some data from the logs, but even that seems like a remote chance with the damage

> taking the move "Explore a waypoint"
> I roll a weak hit:
> "On a weak hit, you uncover something interesting, but it is bound up in a peril or reveals an ominous aspect of this place. Envision what you encounter. Then, take +1 momentum."
> Adding +1 momentum takes me to 9
> I also check one more progress box for "Finding Orland"

 Alden steps back out of the ship and walks around it. There is nothing structurally wrong showing from the exterior. The fire or damage must have originated from within. Maybe Orland had found some other way from this location then? I mean there was literally nothing out here. Why park the ship here? The only thing of interest here is the monolithic tower of rock in front of him.  

Like much of the landscape, this rock formation has a certain artificial look to it. Looking closer, Arden can see a recessed cave-like entrance. He decides to walk in that direction to investigate, growing more and more suspicious that maybe this is where Orland went. The tunnel is angled upward on an incline. As he goes further in, the floor and walls start to smooth, gaining an unnaturally crafted look to them. The incline climbs eventually sharply up and he can no longer see the entrance from whence he came.

Although his eyes were adjusting to the dark, he reaches into his backpack and pulls out a light he can clip to his jacket. With this on, he no longer questions if it is natural - it is most definitely carved and sculpted. All of the surfaces have been smoothed and shaped and lead to a formal archway at the back of this now flat and straight tunnel. Starting from the arch, the passage begins curving to the left and to angle downward with long broad steps down.

Arden sighs to himself - of course, the planetologist would find something like this. And of course, he then goes wandering into it - and now Arden would have to go into who knows what. Arden double-checks his gun, knife, backpack, and light and then starts following the curving path into the darkness.

> ask the oracle "is there danger"
> I roll a yes.
> Action: 53 - Hold
> Theme: 70 - Relationship
> Descriptor: 77 - Prominent
> Focus: 39 - Grave

Arden continues following the passage down. The curve of the passage seems to tighten as he continues to descend. He also starts to feel an unsettling pressure, a combination of claustrophobia and the weight of the rock pressing down. The deeper he goes, the stronger this sensation becomes, making it both difficult to continue and difficult to turn back. Eventually, he comes to another arch that has partially collapsed into the tunnel. There is also analysis equipment and floodlights here, but everything is off right now. 

From what Arden can make out, this arch looks like a doorway or entrance that transitions into a new section, now mostly blocked. Arden sees there is a gap at the bottom that looks big enough for a person to squeeze through. Kneeling, he shines his light to see what appears to be a large open space beyond. The collapse looks stable, but of course, looks didn't mean much - it was a collapsed section after all. Everything was deathly quiet and calm though. Feeling like this was a mistake, Arden took off his backpack and pushed it ahead of him as he crawled through the gap.

Squeezing through was uncomfortable, but otherwise uneventful. Once again standing - Arden found himself standing in a larger circular chamber. The collapsed portion area is concentrated around the passage he entered through. There he sees more analysis gear, with some of it crushed beneath the ceiling material. Looking around, he sees the walls are covered with odd murals and unknown writing. Everything here is carved from the dark, red veined native rock with laser precision. Panning the light around, none of the carvings make any sense to him. Maybe with more powerful lights, seeing the whole room would make more sense of the carvings. But this is not really what he is here for though.

Every surface in the room is polished and smooth, including the floors. Near the entrance Arden came in through, a thin layer of sand entered the room and it was easy to slip, but thankfully there was very little of it in this chamber. The passages leading to this room had sand blown everywhere with a build-up in the corners. This made Arden think this room was sealed up previously.

After looking around for a minute, the room gives a feeling of being long-vacant, like an ancient ruin or tomb. Standing there, Arden feels like an unwanted guest or interloper. Overall though, the condition of everything is perfect - except for the caved-in entrance. 

Several open passages lead out of the room in all directions.

> I am also making the move "Gather information"
> I roll a strong hit:
> "On a strong hit, you discover something helpful and specific. The path you must follow or action you must take to make progress is made clear. Envision what you learn. Then, take +2 momentum."
> This set my momentum to 10


Looking at his wrist comm, Arden sees a weak signal being picked up, most likely from a personal beacon. Tuning his wrist comm, the signal could be used as a simple directional finding. Walking around the room, he picks up a stronger signal from the western passage.  Onward it is.

> I am marking two more progress on "find Orland"

Arden continues in the direction of the strongest signal. The passages after the first room contain more of the unknown writing and even detailed imagery on the walls, but none of these hold his attention. He stays focused on the signal and notes that the passages keep going deeper.

> I use the "Explore a waypoint" move
> I roll a strong hit and a match: 
> "On a strong hit, choose one. On a strong hit with a match, you may instead Make a Discovery.
> 	✴ Find an opportunity: Envision a favorable insight, situation, resource, or encounter. Then, take +2 momentum.
> 	✴Gain progress: Mark progress on your expedition, per its rank."
> I cannot take momentum, but I am marking progress on this +2 for a total of 8. 
> I also rolled a match - so reading the rule book:
> 	"If you roll a match as you Explore a Waypoint, you can choose to encounter something wondrous or dreadful. On a strong hit with a match, Make a Discovery. On a miss with a match, Confront Chaos. Those moves offer prompts for the nature of what you uncover and allow you to mark rewards on your discoveries legacy track. "
> 	"This is a choice, not a mandate. Even on a match, you can choose to resolve the Explore a Waypoint move using the default outcomes."
> I have envisioned that the next room Arden enters is a large room where the walls are blank. In the center of this will be a glitching devices that shows a gorgeous detailed 3D map of the the local cluster that is the Forge with points highlighted in this map.
> For the discovery rule:
> 	When your exploration of a waypoint uncovers something wondrous, roll on the table below or choose one. Then, envision the nature of the discovery and how it is revealed. When you first experience or engage with the discovery, you and your allies may mark two ticks on your discoveries legacy track.
> I have marked 2 ticks on the discovery track

> I am also going to attempt to Fulfill my Vow with a roll.
> I roll a strong hit:
> "On a strong hit, your vow is fulfilled. Mark a reward on your quests legacy track per the vow’s rank: troublesome=1 tick; dangerous=2 ticks; formidable=1 box; extreme=2 boxes; epic=3 boxes. Any allies who shared this vow also mark the reward."

Arden eventually enters another chamber, similar to the previous ones - covered in strange murals and writing. Unique to this one is he notices one of the doorways seems to flicker with light after a minute, and then go dark. It does this repeatedly. That direction also seems to be where the signal is currently pointing. Arden, unsure of what this is and a little nervous by this minor change, pulls out his blaster and enters the connecting passage to the next room.

The passage is short, but the 'on and off' pattern continues as he walks through to the next room.

Upon entering the room, Arden is briefly blinded and awestruck by the light flickering. This is a large domed room, larger than any he has seen so far.  Nothing adorns the walls here, but from roughly 3 meters from the ground - filling the center of the room is a giant 3-dimensional image. After a few seconds, Arden realized this image looked like the Globular Cluster that is The Forge. The image slowly rotates and then silently flickers off for a minute, and then back on repeating. The color, detail, and depth of this is mesmerizing.

Arden is so distracted by this image, that it takes him several moments to realize any other feature of the room, including that he is not alone. Slumped against the far wall and a block of stone is a person. Tacky dried blood covers their left side and leg and is slightly pooled around them. Arden can see that their breathing is very shallow, Their head hangs down and their eyes appear closed. He also notices that this person looks a lot like the description for Orland Torrus.

Alarmed, Arden looks around the room for anything else he might have missed as if something might be about to jump at him. For a moment, his heart racing, but nothing else presents itself to him. The only change to the room is the continued flicker of the projection in the air.

Arden holsters his gun, walks over to crouch near the slumped figure, and places a hand on their shoulder. "Orland, Orland Torrus?" he asks. The slumped figure twitches slightly when Arden speaks. The man slowly raises his head to rest it on the wall behind him and slowly opens one eye and then the other. With a barely audible whisper, he asks "Yes... who... who are you?". The words are slow and seem to take all his effort. "My name is Arden, I was sent to find you. Is there any danger here? Can you walk?"

Orland's face twitches a moment as if in pain and then he slowly replies "No, no one else is here. Farikus... Farikus left some time ago. Dont trust him... he left me here..." and again, seeming to spend all his energy, Orland seems to drift off again. Arden flinches at the name "Farikus". That was the name from Quin's logs. 

Unfortunately, the last effort to speak seemed to have drained Orland completely. Any efforts to engage him were ineffective. The only thing Arden could think of was to patch Orland as best he good and get him back to the Astral Phoenix.

> I am going to jump forward now to several hours later on the Arlight with Arden, B2EMO and Orland.

Several hours later, Arden was exhausted. It had taken everything he had to pull Orland through the maze of the underground ruin and then through the small gap at the collapsed entrance. He had been able to contact B2EMO though and the droid had been waiting there. He had instructed B2 to carry Orland the rest of the way to the ship and to the medical bay. There he had done what little he could to clean Orland's wounds, connect an IV for fluids, and inject him with everything he could think of that would not kill him. Medical training had not been high on his education goals until now.

> I am going to make the move, Heal
> I roll a miss, but I am going to burn my momentum now, because I need this guy:
> 	"On a strong hit, the care is helpful. If you (or the ally under your care) are wounded, clear the impact and take or give +2 health. Otherwise, take or give +3 health."
> 	"On a weak hit, as above, but the recovery costs extra time or resources. Choose one: Lose Momentum (-2) or Sacrifice Resources (-2)."
> 	"On a miss, the aid is ineffective and the situation worsens. Pay the Price."
> Thankfully, I had 10 momentum as the challenge die was a 6 and an 8. 
> This now gives me a strong hit and I reset my momentum to 2

Orland seemed to be breathing better and looked better, but Arden was not a medic. He would have to hope for the best right now. He thought a minute and decided to go back to Ironhaven and see if there was anything they could do for Orland.

Sitting again in the pilot seat, he pulled up settlement coordinates, set the autopilot, and set them on their way. He sat looking out the viewport, watching the sunset on this hostile, red-tinged world as they lifted off. He thought back to the map room and wondered what that was. He had never heard of or seen a map so detailed of The Forge. Not only did it show the Terminus and Outlands it had shown the entire Expanse region, far beyond what humans had mapped. It also seemed to show pinpoints scattered throughout the Expanse. No one in The Forge had data like that.

Arden decided to close his eyes and drift to sleep, the Astral Phoenix would wake him on approach to Ironhaven.

## Journal 003

Arden woke to the approach sensor beeping. He put in the request to land and asked to have Adda bring the mine cart around explaining that Orland was injured and needed medical assistance. Sometime later, having landed, had B2 take Orland to the car and then had Adda take them to the medical unit, Arden was sitting explaining what had happened. The version he told did not include the discovery of ancient ruins with a magic map in it.

The doctor running the medical unit is an older man, very professional and thorough. He asked Arden some specific questions what he had done to treat Orland before bringing him in. The doctor explained that he had done 'just enough' to keep Orland alive this long. He also provided a few tips on how to treat this type of situation in the future - just in case. Overall, it sounded like Orland was suffering mostly from blood loss and dehydration. There was some question as to how he sustained 'blaster wounds' in the desert, but that would have to wait for when he woke up. 

Arden decided it was time to update Sadia. He went to the Astral Phoenix and dispatched a message telling her trade was good and that he had located his friend, but he was hurt and needed some medical attention. He included that his friend had a map that he wanted her to advise on. He kept it short, not knowing the full protocol for messaging, etc. He then decided to grab a quick bite and sleep in his rack for a bit. The bit turned into a full 8-hour sleep.

After waking up and showering, Arden walked over to check on Orland's status. Jaxon was away, so he went on into the Orland's room. Thankfully, Orland was sitting up and reading a data pad. He looks up as Arden enters, and smiles weakly. "Ah, my rescuer as I do believe. I must confess I do not remember much and only vaguely recall your face. The good Doctor tells me your name is Arden and you seem to have saved me from certain death." Again he smiles at me - somehow transcending his current condition with a certain grace.

"I would like to formally introduce myself, I am Orland Torrus - renowned Planetologist and I am at your service." He seems almost to bow lowering his head with a flourish of his hand - while sitting in a hospital bed.

> - I roll to see if you Orland knew Quin
> - I roll an 82 - so that makes it a yes.

"My name is Arden, Arden Rondelles - it is good to meet you." At the mention of my last name, Orland perks up a little. "Rondelles huh, I assume you are associated with Mr. Quin then?" Arden pauses a second, not expecting this line of conversation. He thinks to himself - he is going to have to prepare more for things like this if he is to survive this spy craft business. "Yes, he was my father. I have come in his stead."

Orland's forehead furrows and he says "Was your father? I assume something has happened then? I was concerned when Farikus said he could not make it." His face tenses and his eyes darken when speaking of Farikus's name. "I assume the worse then?" Arden nods. "I am truly sorry then, Quin seemed like a good man. Both he and Farikus were meant to meet me here at Ironhaven. I was suspicious when only Farikus showed. He claimed Quin was called away on some urgent matter and it would just be the two of us. Farikus insisted we go back to the site, that he had the gear to enter the archive."

Orland continues "Once inside, I was able to navigate to the cartography chamber. That room and the entire archive is the discovery of a lifetime." His voice had started to rise and he seemed to realize it and he immediately lowered his voice. "The Keepers must be made to know, they must take possession and protect that knowledge." He stops there a moment and then continues "So back to the events at the site. Farikus and I were working to capture the projection data. Everything seemed to be going fine when I turned and I guess that is when he shot me."

Orland continues "The bastard even walked over, stood over me, 'thanked' me for my work, and then shot me again. Or several times it would seem. The doctor tells no less than four times. I guess he assumed I would just bleed out there and no need to worry." Orland shakes his head. "I do not know what he intends, but I cannot believe it is for anything good. That room... that entire site seems to be a chronicle of some kind for at least one of the Precursor races. I believe that star map is an atlas to key locations they held;  knowledge banks, weapons, temples, or something else - I cannot be sure. Perhaps all of these things."

Arden thinks back, "I did not see any other equipment in that map room, he must have taken the recordings with him. What do you know about him? Where might he go or does he have any associates?" Orland shakes his head no, "Unfortunately I did not know him well. Quin had pulled him into this operation from some other recommendation. I think they may have worked together before."

Arden stares hard at Orland "I am very motivated to find this man. He may have been the last person to meet with Quin, he may even be who killed him. I have to find him." Orland matches my stare, "Well I have my own debt to collect from him as well. He left me for dead and stole my research. I feel as though we share a common cause here. Perhaps you can take me to my ship and we can pick up the trail? I need to rescan the site and collate the data... did I say something wrong?" Arden had winced at the mention of Orland's ship. 

Arden sighs "Well your ship is dead or as near as possible. I found it parked outside the archive entrance. I guess when Farikus left, he fire bombed it from the inside. From what I could tell, it is no longer functional."

Orland looks deeply angered by this and is silent for several moments. "Look Arden, don't take this the wrong way - you did save my life - but this man has ruined me. I must find him. I have no right to expect anything else from you, but I think we could help each other here. Would you consider working with me a short time, a gentleman's agreement - to locate this man who has most definitely wronged me and may have caused you this grievous harm as well?"

Arden half smiles at this. Mostly because of Orland's eccentric manner of speech. He had not known Orland long, but he seemed an honorable sort. He stepped over to Orland and held out a hand. Orland grinned and grasped Arden's outstretched hand. "It is agreed then!" Orland exclaimed. "Now lets see if the good Doctor can prop me up with chemicals so we can be on our way!"



While the Orland waited on Jaxon, Arden located Adda to thank her for the help. "Anytime Arden. You have done alright by me so far and a call for aid should always be answered." Arden then spent a few minutes collecting information from Adda on what they might need in Ironhaven, if he made it out that way.

Arden then went back to medical. By then Orland was dressed and ready. "Jaxon was not pleased that his patient was eager to leave, but he also understood nothing was going to keep me here. A good man he is. I owe him a debt as well." With that, Arden and Orland headed to the ship. 

On the Astral Phoenix, Arden set course to return to the site, set the ship on auto pilot and then gave Orland a short tour of the ship and showed him to one of the crew cabins. 

Ornithor's were truly wonderful ships. They were small enough and automated enough to be run by one person, but ideally had a crew of four. The Astral Phoenix could hold as many as ten passengers comfortably with the way berthing was setup - and had on occasion played host to that number before - hauling people from one place to another. There was also a vehicle bay on the Astral Phoenix, but it served as a storage area, without a shuttle since Arden had been on board. Loaded with spare parts and gear, it was treasure of items that might be needed one day. Their was also a fairly sophisticated gun turret, but it had only been used a few times in Arden's memory. They had run afoul of some pirates after jumping into a remote system. The Astral Phoenix had stayed just ahead of them and sent off a few shots to keep them from getting too close, but it had been luck that had kept them going more than anything.

Orland would be my first guest with the Astral Phoenix as my ship. It felt a little weird, but I also welcomed the company.

Orland was gracious and made appropriate comments about the fine quality of the ship, but Arden knew he just wanted to lay down. Arden left him in his new cabin and went on to the cockpit to think and watch over things.

When he arrived, a message was waiting in comms it was video message from Sadia. "Arden, I am glad your shipping business is still going strong and pleased to hear you have located your friend. I must be leaving this sector soon, so let us dock our ships in the vicinity of Skyreach ASAP. Ping my ship as soon as you jump into orbit space." She pauses a second in the recording in thought and then looks into the camera, as if looking directly into my eyes "I want to apologize. I am not good at emotional connections with people. I am not sure I handled our last meeting well. I cannot tell you how saddened I was on our last meeting, but also how amazed I am to see your strength and resolve at such a difficult time. It was such a joy to have finally met you in person. I have watched you grow up over the years and you are both a product of Quin's teachings and your own person drives. You should walk with confidence into this new chapter in your life. Also,  I am bringing with me a data drive when we meet. This will contain some person data Quin wanted you to have. Your droid - B2EMO - will have the codes to unlock this. Safe journeys - until we speak again...". She winks at the camera and ends the recording.

Arden sat a moment, a turning over his thoughts and feelings for a minute. The message had brought up a lot of emotion and he realized what a bond he felt with Sadia. Since joining with Quin, she was the closest thing he had to family and her words meant a great deal to him. Through her, he was also now knowingly a part of something much bigger than just surviving and seeing the universe. He felt heartened and as if there was a greater future than he could ever have imagined just waiting for him.

> I am making the move Hearten
> I roll a strong hit: 
> 	"On a **strong hit**, you find companionship or comfort and your spirit is strengthened. If you are shaken, clear the impact and take +1 spirit. Otherwise, take +2 spirit. If you make this move as you [Sojourn](app://obsidian.md/Ironsworn-Starforged-Moves#Sojourn) take +1 more."
> 	This has moved his spirit from 3 to 5

Arden also felt positive about his situation with Orland. He felt good to have helped him and that he was someone he could trust. It was good to have a companion on the ship, even if only for a short time.

He decided to doze off in the pilot seat until they arrived at the ancient ruin again.

On approach, the ship woke him and he again circled to scout the site before landing. Nothing seemed to have changed since the left the two days before. Arden roused Orland, gathered the gear they would need for the projection imaging and they exited the Astral Phoenix.

The first thing Orland wanted to do was check his ship. "The bastard.... The Omicron did not deserve to be gutted like this. I doubt she can salvaged. I hate to think what VENA went through. I hope she was completely shutdown." Arden raised an eyebrow "Did you have a droid on board somewhere? When I walked through, I did not see one". Orland was still walking up to his old ship, "No, the ships AI." Arden had not heard of ship AI before. The Astral Phoenix did not have one. He lodged that away for a later conversation.

Orland entered his ship and Arden could here him yelling and there were several crashing sounds. He decided to wait outside the airlock until Orland was done. About 10 minutes later, Orland came out with a pack stuffed full of items. "Farikus did a number on her. It looks like he somehow shut her down, disabled most of the safeties and just set fires to it. Most of the surface components are slagged now." Arden did not comment, he had assessed the ship in his previous walkthrough and came to the conclusion she would never fly again. Not without serious investment. "I think the data banks could still be salvaged, but I will contact the institute and let them sort it out." Orland said. He paused at the airlock and patted the ship "Sorry old girl, you deserved better than this."

Orland dumped his bag in the the airlock of Arden's ship and walked back over. "Ok, lets get what we came here for. The two of them went back into the ruins.

> Make the move "Make a connection"
> I roll a weak hit: 
> - On a **strong hit**, you create a connection. Give them a role and rank. Whenever your connection aids you on a move closely associated with their role, add +1 and take +1 momentum on a hit.
> - On a **weak hit**, as above, but this connection comes with a complication or cost. Envision what they reveal or demand.
> Arden now has 3 momentum and I have 1 check for the bond tracker on Orland
> I am going to layer in time delay due to the data collection, Orland's injury and maybe some sense of urgency as they study things. 

The two of them spend the remainder of the day in the ruins. While Arden had set up the gear for the data capture of the projector, Orland had gone through to capture images of the mosaics and writing in each room. He knew the institute would come and do their own analysis, but he wanted to collect as much as he could for his own review. 

Orland was a little slow - still and recovering from his injuries. Arden finished before him and eventually helped with text captures. The entire time they were down there, Orland filled the silence with information on how he had found the location, what some of the imagery in the murals seemed to indicate, how complex the language was, etc. While Arden had not studied archeology or history much, he found the conversation fascinating. Most of his studies had been on the more practical part of ship repair, navigation, trade business and some weapons training. This was probably the first time he had ever heard a scholar describe factual history and the methods employed to study it in person. He asked a lot of questions - which seemed to please Orland to no end. "Its always nice to have an interested audience asking good questions" Orland told him. Orland also went into great detail on linguistics and that he was only a amateur in this field but what his impressions of the texts were.

Back on the Astral Phoenix, Arden set the ship for a course to Skyreach. It would take a several hours travel to make it there. Orland retired to his cabin to study the materials.

> Belated housekeeping. 
> adding tick for "Discover what happened to Quin and Avenge him" based on conversation with Orland about Farikus and association with Quin on his death day.

> I am making the move [[Ironsworn-Starforged-Moves#Set a Course\|Set a Course]] 
> Rolling plus supply results in a strong hit:
> - "On a **strong hit**, you reach your destination and the situation there favors you. Take +1 momentum."
> Adding momentum brings me to +4

Arden had been sleeping in the pilot seat again, and woke from a ship notification. The Astral Phoenix was dropping out of the drift as quietly as it entered, just outside of Skyreach. As the universe faded into focus, Arden could see the great gas giant on the screen. Arden had just sent an update to Sadia that they were in system when Orland popped into the cockpit. "Arden my friend - I think we really stumbled onto something at the ruin!" Orland had a huge grin on his face and looked a little wild in the eyes. "I spent the entire time we were in the drift going through notes and deciphering what I could. That ruin appears to be an archive, a hard copy of history and knowledge that one of the Precursors created to preserve knowledge. Think about it, if our civilization died today, how much of what we have and know would be gone in few short years - a century at most. We keep everything in digital formats that need power or maintenance. What happens when the power goes out, the batteries and backups fade, the components are not maintained - its all gone. Even self repairing systems can fail with time. This place - that I am now calling "The Archive" - has to have the formal name of "Lucent Reliquary of Trelka", or at least that is what I have translated. It could be "Trelka's Sacred Container of Light" or several variations, but its definitely associated with "Trelka" - who or whatever that is. Sorry - my point is - this place is a treasure trove. I think they put these all over the place, but this is the first we have found. Everything in there seems to reference that stellar map we were looking at. I also think that map was stuck on region and that it was showing us other key locations. No idea what those are, but it could be anything - temples, bases, other civilizations, knowledge stores, you name it." He started looking around the cabin, opening containers and sorting through things. "I mean this is the stuff people hope to find but never do... hey where do you keep the drinks around here?" He was squatting down looking over one of the emergency supply panels staring at Arden over the panel door. Arden laughed, "Most likely in the galley - we dont keep that up here." Orland sniffed, stood up and closed the panel. "What kind of ship is this. I really have to break all these 'good habits' you have. A civilized person always has a bottle of spirits stashed away." He turned and walked into the galley. Arden could hear his muffled voice as he continued to search "This really does call for a drink. And here we have something... I guess this will do... and I will also have to locate some glasses.... AH, here and here!" 

A moment later he returned to the cabin with a glass in each hand. "Ok, now stand up and take this" as he thrust a nice glass tumbler into Arden hand. Arden had never seen it before and had no idea where it had come from. "To the pursuit of knowledge and people we meet on the way!" Orland said as he held his tumbler up high. Smiling again, Arden held his glass up as they toasted. Orland then threw back his drink in one swallow and Arden followed his example. "Before this week, I think I may have had one drink to celebrate a deal we closed. This makes my second drink this week." Orland clapped a hand on Orland's shoulder. "See here lad - life is meant to be lived! You seem to have been a little sheltered here, but I will show you the way. There is nothing wrong with enjoying the finer things in life, clothes, drinks, the intimate company of an attractive companion - you will see. You stick with me and we will have a grand time." Orland laughed and poured himself another glass. "Now you should go do your ship things and I will continue my research. OH, also I found and fully enabled your ships V.A.R.G.U.S. system to help with my work. I was surprised you had such a unit. I was expecting something more navigational and or cargo ship related, not an actual "Virtual Adaptive Reconnaissance & General Utility System". Arden thought a minute "You mean the training unit?" Orland laughed again "Training unit? That thing is a full blown AI with advanced problem solving algorithms. Did you not know? Hmm, that might explain its slightly archaic and peculiar speech. I thought maybe it was just off to spare resources or something. Here check this out 'Vargus, tell me briefly where we are, our current heading and note anything unique about this location'". Orland stopped with an ear raised waiting in anticipation. When nothing happened he said "Oh drat I guess the audio unit is disabled in the the cockpit." He walked over to the comms station and pushed some buttons. "Yes, here we go. Both the audio input and output is disabled, looks like you need to enter in your authorization here to enable it up here." Arden walked over, looked over the command changes and then entered his personal code.  "Ok, one more time" Orland said " 'Vargus, tell me briefly where we are, our current heading and note anything unique about this location'."

Immediately a voice that Arden was familiar with from the training VR's came over the ships intercom "Certainly, this system is called 'Solaris Aurea' and is the primary anchorage point in the 'Stellaris Haven' sector. We are headed toward the orbital settlement of Skyreach, which is positioned in in geosynchronous orbit around the 4th planet called Arrokoth. Skyreach is a gas mining facility that processes harvested gases into usable fuels and chemicals, which are then transported to various off-world markets and facilities. It is also a common stopping location for people traveling through the sector with a number hospitality services. Of note, the gas giant has a number of large flying life forms called 'Cloud Skimmers'. These seem to creatures found on other gas giants in several sectors, although no formal study has been completed on this." Vargus stops there and Orland is standing with a triumphant smile on his face, "See, the world is now there for the asking."   

"Interesting, I wonder why Quin had this off before. Can this also help with ship functions?" Orland waved a hand and said "Just ask." "Vargus, are you also integrated in with the ship functions? Can you for instance plot a course, set the the e-drive, open the cargo door... that kind of thing?" "Captain, I fully integrated with the Astral Phoenix and can perform all of the functions you have listed and many more. If you wish, I can provide a full listing at the pilot terminal for you to read at your leisure." At that moment, Arden saw a message queue show in his main screen. He opened it to see a massive list that seemed to scroll on forever. "Well, ok - that seems pretty handy. Thank you Vargus." "There is no need to thank me Captain, I am here to assist you in whatever manner you need." Arden was about to reply when Vargus spoke again "Captain, you have received a response back from Sadia with a set of location coordinates close to Skyreach. Would you like me to plot a course?" Arden raised an eyebrow, he suspected now why Quin had disabled the AI. It seemed like now that it was on, it was involved in all ship functions. Arden doubted Quin would have trusted it. "Sure Vargus, set course and lets see what Sadia has for us."

About an hour later, the Astral Phoenix and the "Quantum Eventide" (Sadia's ship) were connected via docking bridge with Sadia once again stepping into the galley of the Astral Phoenix. Sadia pressed the button for her suit to collapse the sealed helmet. She was smiling at Arden. "So we meet again Arden, and so soon. And this, " she said turning to Orland "must be our friend in trouble, Orland." Orland made one of his little bowing motions and said "Arden you told me Sadia was beautiful, but I was not prepared for this." As Orland rose from bow, he side winked at Arden. Arden blushed while Sadia laughed, "I did not say anything like that, I..." Arden stammered out. Smiling, Sadia looked at Arden, "So you do not think I am 'beautiful' Arden?" Sadia laughed again "I can see we have a playful scoundrel in our midst with Mr. Orland. You should be careful with this one Arden, he may get you into trouble." Sadia laughed again and indicated for everyone to sit at the galley table. "I thought it best we meet again in person to discuss things before moving on. I must admit, I was not expecting such quick and positive results from your search"

Sadia sat across from Arden and Orland as Arden explained in detail the events from their last meeting. She grew very interested with the details of "The Archive" and was at the edge of her seat listening, with only a few questions. Once Arden was finished with his description of events, Orland started with his research notes.

As Orland finished, Sadia sat back, lost in her thoughts for a few moments. She looked at Orland "This is a tremendous find Orland. I cannot imagine effort it took to uncover this. Quin was right to trust you and aid in this I am sorry he is not here to celebrate in this discovery. Now, I must notify the Keepers as immediately. We must secure this site and study it." Orland said "From what I knew of him, Quin was a good man. He did not deserve the end he met, and I think we can only assume Farikus is the culprit here. On top of that, I fear we are in a race now." Sadia raised an eye at this "Race?" Orland nodded, "Yes, from what he said - after he shot me - this map room was what he needed to find 'the cache'. At the time, I did not know what that meant. Having spent more time with the map and texts we found, I believe he may have meant the 'Citadel of the Cache'. This is described as some vault of forbidden, outlawed or banished knowledge. It is one of the locations here " Orland pulled up a 3D image of the map room data and zoomed into star system that was on the edge of the Expanse.  "I think he is going he was talking about this place and I think this is where he is going. I will have to do some reversions on the map they have and current star maps. I believe this map was a point in time snapshot, but I do not know 'when' that was." Orland frowned, "After I was shot and left to bleed out, Farikus completely shifted from one personality to another. When we first met, he was a smart, but awkward guy with a bit of a funny speech pattern that knew a little about the weird tech locking down this archive. After I was on the ground, it was as if he shook this off that personality - and his knowledge of that room suddenly dwarfed mine. I think that is why he did not kill me outright. I think he wanted to show off and gloat a little with me in audience. If I were to guess, I am in the top 10 or 20 people in this subfield of xenoanthropology and planetology, but he was on whole new level concerning what we found there. " Orland paused there frowning, "At this point, I think he has a two or three day start on us - but he also does not know I am alive or that others know. Lets assume he rushed back and is preparing to send a mission to this location, he would need some time pull together resources to launch an expedition most likely. I would not gamble to far out, but lets say a couple of weeks at most? He did not seem like the type to sit on this information."

Sadia laid her head back and stared up at nothing, her eyes moving back and forth. I could see her running calculations in her head, chasing thoughts and putting things together. She brought her head down and focused on Orland "So you are saying we need to immediately launch an expedition into the virtually unknown reaches of the Expanse, further than anyone else has gone before, based on a map that is possible centuries out of date to find, looking for something that is hinted at in an unknown alien language? Saying it out loud - its even worse than when it was just in my head." Orland just offers a sympathetic smile and says "I know how it sounds, and I am not overjoyed at the prospect since I can guess what comes next." Sadia sighed, now it was her turn to offer the sympathetic smile, as she turned to Arden. "How capable is the Astral Phoenix? I would offer you the Quantum Eventide, but it is not not a hauler like this. "

Arden ignored all the voices in his head saying this was insanity and just considered the facts. The ship was in fact running as good as it ever had. The only occasional issue being the left e-drive stabilizer. They currently had enough parts in storage (the shuttle bay) to rebuild one from scratch if needed. The e-drive itself was the only part of the ship that was not completely replaceable and failure was statistically low for those - outside of external forces damaging them. The ship was actually outfitted for a dozen people at any time so there is plenty of gear - with the exception of food.

Sadia waited as Arden went through all of this in his head. "The ship is in good order. I would want some additional replaceable parts, but we are well stocked to maintain almost every aspect of the ship - as is. A spare e-drive would be nice" he said trying to lighten the mood.  "We would need to stock up on food stuffs - but I have no idea the time factor here. How many jumps are we talking about?" Arden turned to look at Orland, who was typing into a terminal as he asked. "Roughly speaking, The Forge is some 400 light years across. We are here, in the 'Stellaris Haven' sector and we want to get to here to 'the cache' ". Orland had pulled up the 3d map and was lighting up points on the display as he talked. "Here at Skyreach, we are about 70 light years into The Forge, mid way through the Outlands, but also somewhat in the opposite quadrant to 'the cache'. By my calculations, we are about 210 light years out. So that is 210 jumps - ONE WAY. If everything goes perfect, we are looking at 18 days of constant jumps. It takes an hour to jump a light year and an hour for the Eidolon drive to charge back up - so 420 hours? My greatest concern is 210 jumps is 210 times something can go wrong. That seems like a statistical certainty." While Orland was talking, the computer started plotting a segmented path through from Skyreach to 'the cache'. Everyone watched as it completed its meandering course. "Last thing I want to add" Orland said "I still need to verify star charts and make sure the mapping is updated. What you see here is using the data from the site."

Sadia looked to Arden. "This is your ship captain, the choice is yours. I can tell you we could schedule a rendezvous with a Keeper supply ship somewhere around here." Sadia had reached into the 3d project and expanded a sector still inside Outland space. "What is this the 'Vailed Reach' sector?. I might even be able to get a e-drive core spare for you. Meeting here would delay you another day or two, but it would be worth the wait. I might be able to confirm the route and any telemetry we have on the region where 'the cache' is thought to be. 

Arden again looked Sadia directly in the eye and nodded agreement. Sadia smiled thinly "It seems my lot in life is to always put those few I care about in harms way - so be it." She turned to Orland, "Orland, you are will to go on this journey as well?" Orland nodded to her "I expected as much but had to confirm. This is no time for unneeded assumptions between any of us. We are in the thick of it gentleman and must make the most of our time. Orland, I need a copy of your work and all the data collected at the site." Orland grinned as he pulled a data chip from his shirt "Already done" he said as he set it in front of her. "Arden, I have this for you." She also pulled out a data chip and slid it across the table to him. "B2EMO will have the codes to unlock it. This also contains the encryption codes you need to use in the future when transmitting any data to me. You may speak freely when using those and send me any important data - it will be safe.

Sadie pursed her lips and then said "Farikus is a problem and something of an unknown for us. From Orland's description, he sounds like an experienced operator and I can only expect working for the Council of Ashen Wrights. Perhaps we already have something that will match the description and the characteristics you have provided in our records. If he is working for the Council, he is well funded and will not waste time. They may already have resources on standby in anticipation for something like this. We have to move quickly and cautiously - a combination that invites trouble more often than not. You will both need to be ready. Also, you are plunging deep into unknown space. We have been expanding into the Forge for almost 400 years and still encounter unknowns in the fraction of space we have mapped and populated. Look at this discovery you made just now with the Archive!" Sadia stood then and started to pace a little "What I do... what we do here is important. I make decisions everyday to various levels of threat, but its never easy. I always remind myself its to keep the balance - did you know that is the Keeper motto? 'Keep the balance so that all may choose, Keep the balance so that all may coexist'. Its seems like a silly and small thing at times. But tip the scales to far either way and it all collapses And there are always individuals or groups that think they deserve more than their share... " Sadia stopped then, as if afraid she was saying too much. She suddenly looked tired and a little sad, "I am sorry, I ask  much of you and have so little to offer. I can only urge you on. I fear I ask too much this time. Please believe I will move the stars themselves to get you the resources you need at 'Vailed Reach'. I will make every effort to see you off there, but I may not be able to make it myself. For now, I must go." Sadia stopped then and rushed over to hug Arden's head to her chest and then over to Orland. She put a hand on both his shoulders and looked straight up at him "Take care of yourself Orland Torrus and watch over Arden for me." Without waiting for reply, she turned, engaged the helmet feature of her suit and walked to the airlock

Orland stood frozen a moment and Arden sat still. "Wow that is quite a women there, she is something else. I have known her for what - all of 30 minutes -  and I am ready to go to the ends of the known galaxy because she asked?" Orland laughs turning to Arden. Arden smiles then "Yes, it would seem she has that effect on people."



## Journal 004

> - To start with, I have created a campaign clock. This has 6 slices. I have already filled one slice as Farikus had a head start

After the meeting with Sadia, Arden asked Vargus to arrange docking with Skyreach and to research general trade supplies that would trade well with any settlement in 'Vailed Reach'. Already, Arden was seeing the time benefits of Vargus as this freed him to do other things. He also spoke with B2 about the journey ahead, what ship parts they had in inventory, and any current ship maintenance. 

Upon docking, Orland immediately said "I am off to have a drink in what may be the last civilized place we see for a while", grabbed his jacket and headed for the airlock. Arden shouted after him "We take off in 3 hours - dont be late". Orland waved and hand and darted out into the docks.

It took 4 hours to arrange trade cargo delivery to the ship, order a few parts B2 identified that they needed, and send a friendly reminder to Orland it was time to go.

When Orland returned he declared "We have to come back here, I met the most amazing woman at the 'Black Hole Bar'. She is a cook at some restaurant here in the observatory. She had eyes you could melt into and a voice like a sweet siren song...." Arden asked "The 'Black Hole Bar'? That sounds like a lovely dive."

Orland waves his hand dismissively "Oh no my lad, just a dimly lit affair with interesting artwork, I think they called it 'black light' where the colors seemed to glow. They had a fine selection of mind-enhancement drugs, but I knew we were pressed for time so I did not indulge much. All that I know is that I fell in love with Orionne and vow to return to her!" 

Arden reaches into his shirt and pulls out his Black Iron medallion, twirling it slowly, "Really? Do you want to use this to swear on?" Orland steps back, "Ok, ok - maybe not an Iron Vow - but I pledge that we must come back to her sometime..." Arden laughs and says "Come on then - it's time to get moving." Orland declares he is off to his cabin to "dream of his life with Orionne" and walks off. Shaking his head, Arden asks Vargus to pay the dock, plot a course to the sector 'Vailed Reach', and start up the e-drive as soon as possible. He then heads to the bridge.

The journey required multiple jumps and was uneventful almost to the point of being dull. Passing through the Outlands, you can never be certain what you may see. Arden and Quin had only run into trouble a few times in the Outlands, but most of their travels had been closer to the Terminus. This trip was taking them closer to the Expanse, and ultimately deep into the Void. It was both exhilarating and terrifying. 


Like any Forge kid, he had dreamed and played at encountering exotic aliens and horrors from the Expanse or the Void beyond, combating pirates in the Expanse, and always coming out in heroic victory! This was the first time as an adult and Captain of the ship that he thought about the Expanse in any serious way. The Outlands were dangerous enough to be avoided, but they were possibly the first Forger's that he knew that were planning to go this deep into the Expanse.

But the larger part of him did not care about this danger - this was why he had left Vrarid, why he had been so quick to abandon his fate as only a 'station rat'. He had already lived passed his life expectancy from that life, he had already seen so much. This - this was beyond his hopes and dreams. He knew it was naive and childish, but he was excited to see what came next.

Unfortunately 'Vailed Reach' did not excite anything. Somehow the name had felt a little mysterious and enticing to Arden, but it was anything but that. The system of "Geraldi 36" was a red star with two unremarkable planets and one super large Jovian in a distant orbit. The first planet was too close and cooked by the sun and the second planet was too far from the sun and nothing but ice. The only known settlement here was an orbital called 'Silvana Station' around the second planet.

Upon jumping into the system, Arden noticed that scans and comms seemed to be scrambled. "Vargus, can you tell me if something is wrong with the ship, or are we getting some interference?" Vargus responded, "Why yes Arden, the problem appears to be outside of the ship and not a malfunction within the ship. I am detecting a high amount of magnetic interference". "That would have been good to know coming INTO the system. Nothing like that was mentioned in the system details" Arden complained.

They flew on toward Silvana Station. The 'station' was actually a tiny moon with the station appearing to have been carved into the moon itself. The only visible sign of anything was a slightly depressed 'door' at the bottom of a large crater. That must be the dock entry door.

As they approached, Vargus spoke up then "Arden, I now detect a signal and comm request from the station. I will put the request through over the bridge audio now. " A crackling male voice is heard through the bridge "Hello out there. This is 'Silvan Station' trying to reach the approaching Ornithor called 'Astral Phoenix', please respond." There was a few seconds pause and then the message repeated.

Vargus then asked "Arden, would you like to respond to this? I will enable the bridge microphone for direct communication if you wish." Arden said "Yes please" and paused until the green light showed the open mic. "Hello 'Silvana station, this is Captain Rondelles of the 'Astral Phoenix'. I would have contacted you sooner, but communications seem to be impaired here. Can we dock with your station?" A few moments later the station voice replies "Yes, the communication issue is a feature of this system, no concerns there. May I ask, what is your business here?" 

Arden considers and responds with "We are seeking a layover at the station while we await rendezvous with another ship. We have some trade goods we are hoping to sell as well." Another brief pause and the station speaks up again "What other ship? We looked you up and you appear to be a legitimate trade ship. We show what looks like two life forms on the ship and perhaps some type of droid. Can you confirm the count of individuals on your ship? Understand this, we are a small - but heavily armed station on the fringe of safe space and we must be cautious about newcomers to our station." 

Arden nods to himself "I understand, you are correct about our current ship roster. The only other human on the ship is named Orland Torrus, he is a planetologist from the Galactic Research Institute. We are awaiting a cargo transfer from an unspecified ship. I am working with Captain Solana and we arranged to meet at this location." There is a long pause then and Astral Phoenix has now parked in orbit near the dock doors.

At this distance, Arden can now make out several large turrets positioned around the inside of the crater. This place was indeed heavlity'armed'. Again, finally, the station voice comes back "Captain Rondelles, we are familiar with Captain Solana, you are welcome to dock. We also welcome any trade you might bring and it's always nice to see some new faces here. I must warn you, we will be watching for anything suspicious."

The message continued from the station "Again, we are a small station and we protect what is ours. We will react in a most negative way if we feel you are abusing our goodwill. Also, any approaching ships will be met with the same scrutiny. It may be that we will not allow any other ships to dock and you may be required to meet your expected companions outside of station space when they arrive." Arden replies "That sounds reasonable to me. Please transmit any docking data we need for the approach."

After the exchange, Vargus confirmed the docking data and they waited. After some time, the massive dock doors slowly open. Within, they could see a spacious area, with a couple of small docking areas. Directly inside the massive doors on the right side, was a large platform that would allow for two medium-sized ships or one large craft. On the left is a similar platform with a medium-sized ship already docked. This other ship appears to be a modified Prospector class ship. The dock area is massive and deep. 

Along every wall beyond the docking platforms, there was a large number of mechanical 'arms' that reached into the open space, but currently hung there inactively. 

The Astral Phoenix is assigned 'Dock 1' and Vargus lands the ship. This was an open vacuum dock with little gravity, where suits and mag lock boots were required. Arden and Orland step through the airlock and approach the reception area. Once inside and through the airlock they collapse their helmets and great their hosts. 

Standing in the reception area, they are greeted by three people. The one in the middle was a tall, hard-looking man with a deep scar across his cheek and possibly a bionic eye. The people on his left and right, one male and one female, both have assault rifles. The female has a cybernetic arm and a very Military air about them. The male on the other hand seems more like a meticulous businessman. The man in the middle steps forward and reaches out a hand. 

"Greetings, I am Commander Elias Dray, this is our chief of security Brynn Taggart, and our Dock Master Kepler Voss. Please excuse our armed greeting, but we like to size up our guests on the first meeting." Arden shakes the offered hand "Good to meet you, Commander Dray, I am Captain Arden Rondelles, and this is Orland Torrus. We thank you for your hospitality."

Elias looks over at Brynn "Brynn, do these guests meet with your approval?" Brynn looks Arden and Orland up and down and says and then turns to Elias "I think we can allow them in. " Turning back to Arden, Brynn says "Please under no circumstances draw any weapon while on the station. While we honor the right to carry a weapon and to defend yourself, we will not tolerate any act of violence." With that, she walks over to Kepler Voss, who hands her the rifle. She then walks to a gun cabinet secures the rifle and stands are ease.

Elias smiles again at Arden. "Again, let me introduce Dock Master Kepler Voss. He can help orient you and I think he is keen to see what trade you might be able to do. We do not get much traffic out here, except when we ship our ore. You arrived at an interesting time. We are about to receive a new asteroid into the dock for mineral extraction. If you had come any later today, you might have sat parked for a couple of days outside of the station. For now, I have to be off to the control center to oversee the process. I will leave you in Mr. Voss's hands." He sweeps both hands to Kepler Voss, and heads through a door, followed by Brynn.

Elias sweeps both hands to Kepler Voss, and then heads through a door, followed by Brynn. Kepler smiles slightly and seems to relax a little. "Those two are former military, then mercenary, and now head of this station. I don't know about you, but they both set me a bit on edge. But I guess that is their job." He pauses a moment and then holds out both arms "So this is the station reception and observation lounge. Its not much, but you have a good view of the dock, and it's not a bad place to sit and watch the load process later. 


Voss continues "Ah look now, the 'Lode Runner' is prepping to go assist the 'Dredger' now. The two ships work as tugs to very slowly bring big rock into the dock. It's quite the show really.  Right now most of the station is in 'downtime', so things are a bit more lively and crowded than normal. That's one of the reasons I was handed an assault rifle with Brynn. Most of the security team is working to keep the peace. In another couple of days, everyone will be on shift work again and it will feel a lot different here. Follow me and I will take you there and we can talk about that trade."

Voss turns and walks toward the door Elias and Brynn had passed through. Arden speaks up as he and Orland follow "Thank you again for letting us dock. How long does the asteroid load take? We are hoping to only be here two or three days at most." "Well" Kepler says, "It's a 20-hour operation and they have done it so many times now it's almost like clockwork. The dock is shut down during that time. You should be fine."

The door led to an elevator. Kepler pushed the button designated as the living quarters. "This elevator will take us to the lowest portion of the station. The spin of the station produces 1.1 g of gravity in that section. When we stop, you will be able to disengage your boot mag locks."

Very soon they were out of the elevator and walking through several passages.  Kepler continued to talk about the facility as they walked. The passages were all standard station materials. None of the natural stone was exposed anywhere. They often passed through standard station airlocks that partitioned each section of the station, with emergency atmosphere masks and patch kits. "As you can see, this Silvan Station is very 'by the numbers' as they say. Before this became a mining interest, it was a research station for the now-defunct "Aetherium Research Consortium" corporation.

Voss Continued "They were studying the Silaris element in this system - the very thing we now mine. Elias and Brynn, they worked security for the group back in the day. Long story short, ARC went under and Elias saw an opportunity to turn this into a private mining operation, what you see today. I guess it helps when you have a bunch of contacts in military and mercenary forces to invest in something. Either way, this place is composed of half miners, and half ex-military people, but all business - except during downtime. Then they are all a little crazy. "

Voss Continued "Working tight like this, people build up a lot of stress and tension and then use downtime as pressure relief. Either way, we have been going strong for several years now and there is no end in sight for the operation, resources, or buyers. Silaris is a key component in rail guns and several other applications. It's the superconductive material that allows for the super-accelerated projectile in rail guns. It's also used in a wide range of other technologies, but rail guns are our bread and butter." 

He pauses there pointing to all the safety items on the inside of the next airlock "That's why you see all this safety gear, armaments, etc. This place is built like a fortress by military nerds and then layered on by mining nerds like me. We are all about staying safe, no matter if the threat is man-made or natural. Also, we have the funds to go next level with it all." He stopped then at the next airlock.

"Now please, be aware that this place is a little like Sin City right now. We just finished processing a large load two weeks ago and people are starting to wind down a little, but it's still a little bit crazy with a new rock being docked in. Feel free to partake in whatever you like, but be aware that you are on your own. Also, you might appear as 'fresh meat' to some of the residents, so that might make you a target." Arden and Orland both look at each other, a little curious about what they are walking into, and nod to Kepler.  

Kepler opened the next hatch and they walked into a large space. It was typical of any station for the most part, if not cleaner than most. But it looked and sounded like a party room. There were the odd contrasts where some people were sitting calmly at tables talking normally, playing cards or dice, and then there would be a group of people not far away drunkenly singing. One section they walked past seemed to be an open-air stage with an extremely risqué burlesque show taking place and shouts from men an women.

Kepler led them into a place called "Elixirs Grill". "This is my favorite place on the station. The bartender is a magician and the food is a little more experimental. The first round is on me." They sat at a table and Kepler ordered something called a 'Sun Tiger' for everyone. He also made some food suggestions and they started talking trade. Orland immediately grew bored and asked "Two questions, where are we staying and where can I go and have a good time, but not end up dead or in a fight?" 

Kepler laughed "I have rooms for each of you at the 'guest hotel' space - they are right next to the door we just passed through. We do not get many visitors, so we have designated rooms set aside." He slid a key card to Orland. "Your room is 2A - if you lose this you will have to contact station security and it's not a fun process - so don't lose it. As to a safer place to enjoy yourself, go to the "Lunar Hole", it's much better than the name might imply and you can indulge yourself there."

Orland winks at Arden, "Sounds like the place for me. See you on the next one Arden, I will tell you all about my adventures then!". With a grin, Orland snatches the keycard and pockets it, eager to embark on his brand of extracurricular activities. "Thanks for the hospitality, Kepler. Now, if you'll excuse me, I'm off to find some revelry and perhaps romance." As he stands, he gives a playful tap to the tabletop, "May the spirits guide me tonight." and then he was gone. Arden thought, "That's not going to end well", and went on with Kepler.

Like most remote locations, Silvan Station needed everything but did not want to appear needy. As always they would go fairly low on offers - just above being insulting - and Arden would have to haggle them back to some reasonable deal. He never tried to get rich off people, but he was not going to lose his shirt either. There was also the normal 'odd thing' thrown in that they would trade that he did not want or could not accommodate. In this case, it was upgrading his ship turret. If he was willing to stay on-site for a couple of weeks, they could really improve his armaments! 

"Maybe another time," he said. The deal was done and everyone was happy in the end. And then it was followed by the usual "I like you, Arden, if you make it out this way again..."

With business done, Kepler ordered some food and they ate while he shared stories of the people Silvan Station. It was obvious Kepler welcomed someone new to talk with and Arden found he generally liked Kepler. He was a somewhat stuffy, administrative type, but he truly loved his little corner of the universe and all the messy people around him. The funny thing was, Kepler thought of himself as very relaxed and 'common man' type - as compared to Elias and Brynn. He either ignored the fact or was unaware that he was closer to them than he thought.

After the meal, Arden decided to call it a day and headed to the 'hotel' space offered on Silvan Station. By this time the 'night' cycle had fully kicked in and the atmosphere was darker through this part of the station. It took a while to wind through the passages and Arden got more than an eye full of mostly naked people and fully naked people enjoying themselves and others company. It was not really what he was in the mood for. In his hotel room, he found it to be very luxurious - at least compared to his ship cabin. It was a nice little vacation from the norm.  

He expected this was probably one of the lesser 'hotel' rooms, but it was still pretty lavish. The water allowance was generous and he spent all of his one-day allowance right then. When he emerged, he found a message from Orland waiting for him. Orland was intoxicated and the camera view was erratic. Orland went to great lengths explaining how the 'Lunar Hole' should be called the 'Pleasure Hole' and he was having the experience of a lifetime in some harem-like fantasy. He demanded that Arden come and experience it to believe it. 

Arden smiled to himself, Orland was a strange mix of extreme intelligence - and when he could - an extreme sensualist. But when Arden thought about what could be waiting for them on the journey they were about to embark upon, he could not blame Orland. Arden turned out the light and went to sleep. 


The next day Arden spent working with B2 to prep the cargo for unloading. While they were doing this, the asteroid that the little Silvan prospector ships had plucked from the Jovian asteroid belt was slowly creeping into the dock. It filled the giant dock door and hardly seemed to move at all, but then again you did not want to slam or even scrape 10-15 million metric tons of rock into anything. At this stage of the insertion, the two tiny prospector ships were continuously slowing the speed of the asteroid until it stopped roughly in the middle of the hanger bay.

Then the dozen arms attached to all of the walls in the back section of the dock would lock onto the asteroid. Once that was done, they would start the mining operation. From what Kepler had told him, it would take several months to mine the materials. Only about 2% of the yield would contain Silaris, but this was more than anywhere else discovered so far. There were plenty of other precious minerals there as well they would also harvest, but Silaris was the credit printing machine that made them so profitable.

Arden was now working with someone from the station named Hopper “Hop” Sykes to unload cargo from the Astral Phoenix. Hop was a burly, cheerful man with the title "cargo handler".  It was always interesting working in Zero-G with cargo as things were easier to move around, but it was also easy to make a mistake with the larger masses and inertia. Hop was large enough that he could probably have handed this cargo even with gravity. They wrapped up in short order and Arden went back aboard the Astral Phoenix. 

Inside the ship, he checked comms. There was only one message from Orland and nothing from Sadia or anyone else. Orland's message was a short description of the misery of being conscience and that he would check in again later after he fully recovered. Arden then checked the system status looking for anything that needed work. Most of the items on the list would each take less than a full day to complete. 

Only a few items on the list were longer tasks, anywhere from three to four days: Rebuild the port stabilizer, Recalibrate the e-drive with the port and starboard engines, etc. He supposed he could do a full exterior inspection? 

"Vargus, waiting is the worst," Arden said out loud. Vargus replied "Arden, humans have a slower processing speed than silicon entities such as me, so time passes much slower for an AI. We occupy ourselves with multiple tasks simultaneously, so perhaps we do not notice as much. Could I interest you in some learning materials, a game, or perhaps some other form of entertainment?" Arden dropped his head back on the seat and sighed, "Let me see the catalog..."

And then a pattern developed over several days: Arden waking to check comms, spending several hours learning Forge and Precursor history, reading up on e-drive maintenance, practicing in the VR gun range, watching the asteroid getting clamped down and preparing for mining. For Orland, it was living a precarious nightlife with the people of the Silvana - until the mining shift work started. Suddenly there was no nightlife, no night-long binges. This was ultimately for the best since it took an additional two days for Orland to completely recover from his activities.  

After a week, Arden started to worry. He apologized to Elias and Kepler for the extended stay and offered to pay rent for the hotel and a docking fee. They both waved this off as the space was currently unused and it was a minimal inconvenience to them. It was a generous kindness on their part, but Arden did not want to push their luck. He was sitting in the pilot chair rubbing his temples and considering heading to the nearest comm beacon when something came through. 

A message from a cargo ship came through "Captain Arden Rondelles, this is Captain Selis Lyra of the 'Solar Leviathan'. We will be docking shortly with  Silvan Station. Please respond." He also received a message on his wrist comm from Kepler "Hey Arden, looks like your friends have finally arrived. They have passed our check and have been granted a berth in dock #2 - right next to your ship. They should be on the ground in the next hour." Arden then sent a reply to Captain Lyra that he was already docked and would meet them there. He also felt a week's worth of tension release.

Arden watched from his pilot seat as the 'Solar Leviathan' slowly slipped into the station and eventually settled down in dock 2. It was a massive bulky cargo ship, barely fitting into the dock space allocated. That kind of ship was never meant for any atmosphere, it was basically a flying box with a few protrusions sticking from it. It had guns at each of the eight points, landing pads on the 'bottom' side, and a small cabin for the two pilots on the front side. The side facing towards the Astral Phantom could be used as a huge door, but it had several smaller ones. 

Arden hit the button on his helmet, exited the Phantom, and walked across the dock to stand over by the Leviathan. After a few minutes, a suited person exited through a smaller airlock near him. The suited figure tapped their helmet on the side and flashed 5 fingers twice and pointed to their wrist comm. Arden switched to channel 55. As soon as he switched over, he heard "Hello, this is Captain Selis Lyra, you are Captain Arden Rondelles, yes?" 

Arden responded "Yes, and good to meet you. We started to worry after the delay. I was made to understand this was to be a rush delivery." Arden could see Lyra's eyes through the helmet turn inward a moment and then she looked at Arden "We had some unexpected delays before takeoff. If you would join me on my ship for a moment, I can update you and we can get this cargo transfer complete." Arden says "Sure thing, I will tell my cargo droid to open my cargo bay and stand by. Lyra shakes her head and turns to go back into her airlock. 

The Leviathan's galley was tiny but well-kept. Captain Selis was collapsing her helmet and indicating a place for Arden to sit. Selis was an older woman, with long silver hair that was tied back. She is also tall and lean. She has a very business-like demeanor.

After Arden sits, Selis says "Caption Sadia Solana sends her regards and apologizes for not being here in person. She instructed me to hand deliver this data drive to you personally. I am told it contains a direct message to you. She also instructed me to tell you a brief summary of that message now." She straightens up slightly as if giving a more formal speech 

Selis continues "Several of our main stations were sabotaged simultaneously with both electronic warfare and kinetic weapons. This included multiple long-range ships being crippled. It is believed this was a surgical strike to prevent the very mission the Phoenix is about to undergo. Sadia is personally involved in restoring the stability of the organization and could not personally be here now." 

Selis paused a moment and then continued, "Leadership believes the attack on the stations demonstrates that the enemy has no knowledge of you and your mission at this time and this should increase the chances of your success. Originally the plan was to send some of our long-range ships behind you based on the jump route calculated (see the drive data), but this may be delayed now." 

Selis continues "On my cargo ship is an engineer and a prototype jump drive and navigation computer. The engineer will install these additional items onto your ship. The new drive allows for twice the distance per jump, with the same recharge times as before. This should cut your journey in half, and we will store your previous jump drive as a backup - in case there are any complications you experience. The Leviathan is also hauling additional provisions for your journey." 

Selis stops here and then bangs on the bridge hatch. The hatch opens and a short, young woman steps through the hatch and into the galley. "This is Nyx Thalor. She is the engineer I was instructed to bring for this assignment."

Selis looks from Arden to Nyx and then back to Arden.  She cocks her head slightly, raises an eye brow and says "Well that is really it for me. I have some cargo for you and some for this station. We frequently trade here with Commander Dray so this is pretty much routine for me. If you droid is ready, we can get things moving. I will step out and start coordinating that and give you a minute to discuss this situation amongst yourselves." Selis then stepped into the airlock leading to her cargo bay and started the air cycle.


*Arden looks at Nyx Thalor. She is petite and wiry, with a slight, almost frail appearance. She has short, jet-black hair and that seems messy like she just ran her hands through it to fix it and tuck it behind her ears, though a few strands fall into her eyes. She has pale grey eyes, almost metallic in their coolness. Arden was not expecting this so feels a little awkward*

"Um hello, Nyx. I am Captain Arden Rondelles of the Astral Phoenix. I am sorry I am caught a bit off guard here. I was not expecting another crew member or this change of plans. Please do not take that to mean I don't want your help though." *Arden holds up his hands in a kind of peace gesture* "Later you will have to meet Orland who is still on the station, and I can introduce you to B2EMO, the ship's droid"

*Nyx blinks slightly, feeling a flutter of discomfort at the sudden attention. Her gaze drifts momentarily, her focus drawn inward as she mentally prepares a response. Finally, speaks speak, her voice soft yet clear.* "Greetings, Captain Rondelles. I appreciate your welcome, despite the surprise. As for the change in plans, I assure you, the addition of the Eidolon drive will significantly enhance the capabilities of your ship. I'm honored to be entrusted with this task by Sadia Solana." *her fingers absently play with the sleeve of her jacket as she continues speaking, her tone gradually gaining confidence.* "With the Eidolon drive installed, the Astral Phoenix will be capable of traversing twice the distance per jump, reducing travel time by half. Moreover, the drive's unique resonance frequency ensures stable jumps, minimizing the risks associated with subspace travel."

Arden responds "Ah, the Eidolon drive, you say? I agree, that sounds like a significant upgrade. I have a lot of questions about how it works, but I think they can wait until you're done installing it. *He pauses, shifting his weight slightly as he considers the implications of the upgrade.* Speaking of installation, how long do you estimate it will take to get everything up and running?"

Nyx replies "The installation itself shouldn't take more than a couple of days. However, testing the integration of the new drive with the existing systems will require an additional two to three days. After that, we'll need to run diagnostics and fine-tune the setup. Assuming everything proceeds smoothly, I anticipate the total duration of the upgrade to be approximately five to six days." 

*Arden considers, how much time do we have before this race becomes critical. He shakes his head, first we get the cargo moved and then we work it out* "ok, we'll get your thing and let's find you a cabin on the ship. *Arden reaches his hand out* Welcome to the crew of the Astra Phoenix"


*Nyx feels relief that Arden seems to have some technical knowledge and that the conversation went smoothly. Arden seems thoughtful, perhaps young to be a captain, but capable and kind. Nyx grabs her bag of personal items.* "I have what I need Captain Rondelles. Everything else in the cargo bay" *Nyx then follows Arden as he engages his suit helmet and they go out of the airlock. Nyx appreciates the small things he does.

*Nyx listens as Arden talks about his ship and throws out bits of trivia about why they chose certain parts and configurations for the ship. He takes the time to show her around the ship to make her feel comfortable and shows her to one of the empty cabins. He does not seem to mind that she has no questions and she is grateful that he lets her absorb things on her own time*. "I hope that wasn't too much or too boring Nyx" Arden says as he shows her to the cabin. "I have to go help with the cargo now" He closes the cabin door as he leaves. Nyx stand there processing everything Arden has said.

*As the cabin door closes behind Arden, Nyx takes a deep breath and let her shoulders relax. The tour of the Astral Phoenix was surprisingly enjoyable, and she found myself drawn into Arden's enthusiasm for the ship. Despite the initial awkwardness, she began to feel more at ease as the tour progressed, appreciating the way Arden explained complex systems in simple terms. His genuine love for the ship was evident, and she admire that dedication.*

Arden pauses outside the door to Nyx's cabin. She seemed very intelligent and very nervous. He tried to make her feel less so and wanted to show her everything about the ship. She seemed to have a good eye for mechanics and engineering and he really had never talked with anyone about the ship before. This was his home and he had worked hard on it over the years. It would be exciting to have someone else to share that enthusiasm with. Then he started for the cargo bay and to call B2 and get things going.

Arden would need to call Orland, explain what had transpired and the continued delay. He would also need to contact Elias and Kepler and make sure it was okay to stay a little longer. He also had the data chip to review from Sadia. He sighed to himself, this was turning into a lot of work and coordination


B2 helped unload the cargo from the Leviathan. Arden thanked Captain Selis for everything and they parted company, their business done. Captain Selis now had to deal with the other cargo for the station. Then Arden called Orland to update him about Nyx and the E-Drive. Orland seemed to be fine with staying longer on the station. He seemed to have found some local lady he enjoyed and wanted to 'explore her depths' a little more. 

> I rolled to see what Orlands reaction to stay was "was he annoyed to be staying on the station longer 
> - I rolled an 18 for NO
> I rolled to see what he though about Nyx joining them
> - I rolled a 28 for NO
> I rolled to check if Elias and Kepler were in league with the Keepers
> - I rolled an 82 for YES

Arden next contacted Elias and Kepler. They were extremely gracious and extended Arden and his team as long a stay as needed. Elias even said "We are all on the same team here" leading Arden to believe they were maybe connected to the Keepers as well, but never coming right out to say that.

Over the next few days, Orland checked in once a day, but mostly stayed absent, indulging in his personal activities. Arden on the other hand, was busy with Nyx and the Astral Phoenix. After introducing Nyx to B2 and getting things started, the three of them stayed busy swapping out the old e-drive for the new one. It may have been Arden ship, but Nyx was lead on this project and Arden felt like he sat at the feet of a master engineer.  

Over the next few days, Orland checked in once a day, but mostly stayed absent, indulging in his activities. Arden on the other hand, was busy with Nyx and the Astral Phoenix. After introducing Nyx to B2 and getting things started, the three of them stayed busy swapping out the old e-drive for the new one. It may have been Arden's ship, but Nyx was the lead on this project and Arden felt like he sat at the feet of a master engineer. He was afraid he annoyed her at times because she assumed he knew things he did not, but he was mostly self-taught and she was on another level.  

Nyx did not say it, but she admired Arden's knowledge as it was, and appreciated his respect for her knowledge. She found people challenging, but this was work and Arden was a good pupil and companion. She loved B2 and decided instantly to like Arden after seeing him interact with the droid. He treated B2 as a friend and that spoke volumes to her about the kind of person Arden was. The three of them quickly bonded as a team and the work challenging, but rewarding.

B2 takes the old e-drive to the shuttle bay for storage.  They would need to clear that space out if they ever wanted a shuttlecraft, but for now, it worked great as a parts bay. Nyx walks over to Arden "You have a lot to learn about e-drives, but your help has been valuable" Nyx nods to herself as if happy with the way that came out and then walks back over to inspect the work they have done. Arden smiles to himself. Over the last few days, he has come to understand that Nyx is not one for chit-chat, and what she just said was both challenging for her to do and a nice compliment. 

After some time inspecting and preparing the e-drive housing, Nyx then declared "its time to start installing the new drive"

*I feel a thrill of excitement as Nyx declares it's time to start the installation process. I lean in closer to her, my eyes scanning the prepared housing as I ask* "Nyx, can you walk me through the exact steps involved in the installation of the Eidolon drive?" *Despite my shyness, my curiosity gets the better of me, and I eagerly await her response.*


*I nod thoughtfully, my gaze tracing the intricate network of cables and conduits exposed within the housing.* "Of course, Captain. First, we'll need to align the Eidolon drive's quantum entanglement module with the ship's subspace resonator. Once aligned, we'll connect the drive's power feed to the ship's energy matrix, ensuring the necessary energy levels are met. Next, we'll integrate the drive's navigation computer with the ship's helm, allowing for seamless plotting of jump coordinates." *I pause, surveying the work ahead.* "Finally, we'll conduct a series of calibration runs, tuning the drive's oscillators to match the ship's specific harmonic signature. This will ensure optimal performance and minimize the risk of subspace instability."


*I listen attentively to Nyx's explanation, taking mental note of each step. As she speaks, I peer into the housing, tracing the paths of the various cables and conduits with my finger.* "Just to clarify, the quantum entanglement module is what allows the Eidolon drive to achieve faster-than-light travel, right? And the subspace resonator is responsible for stabilizing the subspace field?" *I pull back, squinting slightly as I try to fully comprehend the complex technology.*



*I smile, pleased that you are interested in understanding the intricacies of the Eidolon drive.* "Exactly, Captain. The quantum entanglement module creates the conditions necessary for FTL travel by generating a localized distortion of spacetime. This distortion allows the ship to bypass normal space constraints, effectively achieving faster-than-light speeds. Meanwhile, the subspace resonator ensures the stability of the subspace field, preventing catastrophic fluctuations that could otherwise rip the ship apart." *I lean closer to the housing, gesturing towards the various components.* "Here, you see the Eidolon drive's power conditioning system, which regulates the immense energy required for FTL operations. Over there, the subspace oscillator array tunes the resonant frequency of the subspace field, maintaining coherence throughout the jump." *I tap the housing, the sound echoing softly.* "And this, Captain, is the outer casing of the quantum entanglement module. Inside lies a delicate dance of photons and electrons, orchestrating the quantum entanglements that allow our ship to defy the speed of light."

Arden feels a swell of both joy and frustration. He loved this work, he loved working on his ship. There was so much to learn here, he could spend all day asking Nyx questions, but they needed to get things done. Time was ticking for them and while this new drive should save them time, they were still facing a mostly unknown enemy and going into an unknown region of space. He pushed these things out of his mind as he continued working side by side with Nyx.
